Arkansas, session 2025, HB1564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-10-305 is amended to read as follows:
8-10-305. Motor vehicle racing facilities in certain rural locations —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “motor vehicle racing facility” means any
facility or all-terrain recreational park designed and used for competitive
racing by:
(1) Automobiles automobiles or trucks that are modified for
racing;
(2) All-terrain vehicles as defined in § 27-21-102;
(3) All-terrain vehicles that are modified for racing;
(4) Motorcycles;
(5) Motorcycles that are modified for racing; or
*JMB219*
02/21/2025 12:10:45 PM JMB219

HB1564
(6) Automobiles or trucks that are not modified for racing.
(b) Sections 8-10-302 — 8-10-304 do not apply to a new motor vehicle
racing facility constructed and initially permitted after August 31, 2021,
and located:
(1) In an unincorporated area or town that is one (1) mile or
more from the boundary of a city of the first class or city of the second
class; or
(2)(A) If subject to subdivision (b)(1) of this section, in an
area in which the mayor of the city of the first class or city of the second
class provides a written waiver to subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(B) If the area involves more than one (1) city of the
first class or city of the second class, a written waiver under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section from the mayors of each city involved is required.
(c)(1) A person proposing to construct a motor vehicle racing facility
under subsection (b) of this section may apply to the county judge quorum
court for issuance of a motor vehicle racing facility permit by filing a
permit application with the county clerk that shall contain a written
proposal for the motor vehicle racing facility that includes:
(A) A description of the types of motor vehicles proposed
for racing at the motor vehicle racing facility;
(B)(i) The maximum projected noise level of the motor
vehicles proposed for racing at the motor vehicle racing facility.
(ii) A motor vehicle racing facility permit shall
not be granted for a motor vehicle racing facility that exceeds a maximum
noise level of seventy-five decibels (75 dB) at the property line of the
motor vehicle racing facility;
(C) A description of the kinds of races and the types of
buildings, stands, or other physical plants proposed for the motor vehicle
racing facility;
(D) Estimates of traffic counts and numbers of spectators
at the proposed motor vehicle racing facility; and
(E)(i) Proof of liability insurance providing coverage in
an amount of no less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(ii) Proof of renewals of the liability insurance
described in subdivision (c)(1)(E)(i) of this section shall be filed with the
county clerk; and
02/21/2025 12:10:45 PM JMB219

HB1564
(E)(F) Any other relevant information as may be determined
necessary for the motor vehicle racing facility permit application by the
county judge quorum court, including without limitation the hours of
operation, an assurance of liability insurance, and other information related
to operation of the motor vehicle racing facility.
(2) For the initial permit application for a new motor vehicle
racing facility to be constructed, the applicant shall provide sufficient
information on the environmental impact of the proposed motor vehicle racing
facility.
(3)(A) The county judge quorum court shall set a date for a
public hearing to be held on the proposed motor vehicle racing facility
permit that shall not be fewer than thirty (30) days after the filing of the
initial motor vehicle racing facility permit application.
(B)(i) Notice of the public hearing under subdivision
(c)(3)(A) of this section shall be:
(a) Placed placed on the county-owned or
affiliated website or published through other means as directed by the county
judge quorum court at the expense of the applicant; and
(b) Mailed to all property owners and
residents within a radius of three (3) miles of the proposed motor vehicle
racing facility.
(ii) The public hearing under subdivision (c)(3)(A)
of this section for the initial motor vehicle racing facility permit may be
adjourned and continued if necessary.
(C) The county judge may quorum court shall hold public
hearings for the renewal of a motor vehicle racing facility permit as
necessary.
(D) Any interested persons may appear at a public hearing
under this subdivision (c)(3) and contest the granting of an approval or
renewal of a motor vehicle racing facility permit.
(4) Affidavits in support of or against the proposed motor
vehicle racing facility or the renewal of a motor vehicle racing facility
permit may be prepared and submitted and filed with the county clerk to be
provided to the county judge quorum court for consideration during the public
hearing.
(d)(1) After the public hearing for the initial motor vehicle racing
02/21/2025 12:10:45 PM JMB219

HB1564
facility permit or upon application for the annual renewal of the motor
vehicle racing facility permit, if the county judge is satisfied that the
benefits of the motor vehicle racing facility are sustained by proof and
outweigh the impact of the noise, air pollution, and traffic congestion
caused by the motor vehicle racing facility, then the county judge may the
quorum court shall vote to:
(A) Grant or deny the initial motor vehicle racing
facility permit approving the proposed motor vehicle racing facility; or
(B) Renew or deny the renewal of the motor vehicle racing
facility permit.
(2) The county judge quorum court may deny the renewal of a
motor vehicle racing facility permit if the motor vehicle racing facility is:
(A) Determined to be in violation of any standards under
which the motor vehicle racing facility permit was issued; or
(B) Constructed or is being operated in a manner that is
materially different than was represented during the initial application
process.
(3) The quorum court shall set quiet hours for the motor vehicle
racing facility to be between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m.
(e) If any material changes, additions, or improvements are made to
the motor vehicle racing facility, the motor vehicle racing facility permit
shall be amended accordingly, and the county judge quorum court may
reconsider the approval of the motor vehicle racing facility permit.
(f) A motor vehicle racing facility permit issued under this section
shall be renewed annually.
(g) The county judge quorum court may issue any necessary requirements
and procedures to implement this section, including setting a motor vehicle
racing facility permit fee to recover the cost of issuing a motor vehicle
racing facility permit.
(h) Due to the noise pollution and air pollution from the motor
vehicles and traffic congestion caused by motor vehicle racing facilities, a
motor vehicle racing facility shall not be permitted or constructed under
this section within one (1) mile of the boundary of another county.
(i) There shall be a fine in the amount of one thousand dollars
($1,000) per day if the motor vehicle racing facility violates this section
or does not comply with the requirements of the motor vehicle racing facility
02/21/2025 12:10:45 PM JMB219

HB1564
permit.
(j) This section does not prohibit neighboring property owners to sue
for loss of property value and quality of life or preclude standing of a
neighboring property owner.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that motor vehicle racing
facilities have become increasing problematic for the environment and the
public peace in certain rural locations; that additional measures and
restrictions should be taken to preserve the environment and the public peace
of the citizens who live in rural locations; and that this act is immediately
necessary to preserve the environment and the public peace of the citizens of
this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.















02/21/2025 12:10:45 PM JMB219